Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-126
Transitional provision.

The Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act applies to an assignment made on or after July 18, 2026.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 26.
July 18, 2026